District of Columbia statutes.
7-136

Persons believed to be carriers of communicable diseases — Leaving detention without discharge.

It shall be unlawful for a person detained in a place or institution pursuant to an order of the Mayor to leave said place or institution unless discharged in the manner provided in § 7-134 or 7-135.

Aug. 11, 1939, ch. 601, § 6
Aug. 8, 1946, 60 Stat. 921, ch. 871, § 2
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Oct. 17, 2002, D.C. Law 14-194, § 902(e), 49 DCR 5306
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 44(a), 51 DCR 881
This section is referenced in § 7-140.
1981 Ed., § 6-122.
1973 Ed., § 6-119d.
D.C. Law 14-194 substituted “Mayor” for “Director of the Department of Human Services”.
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.